Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Factory Manufactured Movable Homes

§ 17-1-39.
Zoning ordinances relating to factory manufactured movable homes authorized.

For purposes of this section, the term “factory manufactured movable home” is defined as provided in Section 75-49-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Any municipality or county of this state may adopt and enforce zoning or other land use regulations or ordinances relating to factory manufactured movable homes, including, but not limited to, regulations and ordinances which establish reasonable appearance and dimensional criteria for factory manufactured movable homes, provided that such regulations and ordinances do not have the effect of prohibiting factory manufactured movable homes which otherwise meet applicable building code requirements from being lawfully located in at least some part or portion of the municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1989).